California statutes. Financial Code
(B) The proposed change might raise material safety and soundness or operational concerns.

(C) The proposed change is to digital financial business activity that may cause such activity to be materially different from that previously listed on the application for licensing by the commissioner.

(3) A change of an executive officer, responsible individual, or person in control of the licensee.

(b) A report required by this section shall be filed not later than 15 days after the change described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 52, Sec. 6.   (SB 97)   Effective June 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3309.

(a) For purposes of this section, “proposed person to be in control” means the person that would control a licensee after a proposed transaction that would result in a change in control of the licensee.

(b) The following rules apply in determining whether a person has control over a licensee: 

(1) There is a rebuttable presumption of control if a person directly or indirectly owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, 10 percent or more of the then outstanding voting securities issued by the licensee. 

(2) A
 person has control over a licensee if the person’s voting power in the licensee constitutes or will constitute at least 25 percent of the total voting power of the licensee.

(3) A person has control over a licensee if the person’s voting power in another person constitutes or will constitute at least 10 percent of the total voting power of the other person and the other person’s voting power in the licensee constitutes at least 10 percent of the total voting power of the licensee.

(4) A person does not have control over a licensee solely because that person is an executive officer of the licensee.

(c) Before a proposed change in control of a licensee, the proposed person to be in control shall submit to the department in a
 record both of the following:

(1) An application in a form and medium prescribed by the department.

(2) The information and records that Section 3203 would require if the proposed person to be in control already had control of the licensee.

(d) The department shall not approve an application unless the commissioner finds all of the following:

(1) The proposed person to be in control and all executive officers of the proposed person to be in control, if any, are of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) The proposed person to be in control is competent to engage in the business of
 digital financial business activity.

(3) It is reasonable to believe that, if the person acquires control of the licensee, the proposed person to be in control and the licensee will comply with all applicable provisions of this division and any regulation or order issued under this division.

(4) The proposed person to be in control plans, if any, to make any major change in the business, corporate structure, or management of the licensee are not detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee. 

(e) The department, in accordance with Section 3203, shall approve, approve with conditions, or deny an application for a change in control of a licensee. The department, in a record, shall send notice of its decision to the
 licensee and the person that would be in control if the department had approved the change in control. If the department denies the application, the licensee shall abandon the proposed change in control or cease digital financial asset business activity with or on behalf of residents.

(f) If the department applies a condition to approval of a change in control of a licensee, and the department does not receive notice of the applicant’s acceptance of the condition specified by the department not later than 31 days after the department sends notice of the condition, the application is deemed denied. If the application is deemed denied, the licensee shall abandon the proposed change in control or cease digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents.

(g) The department may revoke or modify a determination under subdivision (d), after notice and opportunity to be heard, if, in its judgment, revocation or modification is consistent with this division.

(h) If a change in control of a licensee requires approval of an agency of the state, and the action of the other agency conflicts with that of the department, the department shall confer with the other agency. If the proposed change in control cannot be
 completed because the conflict cannot be resolved, the licensee shall abandon the change in control or cease digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3311.

(a) Before a proposed merger or consolidation of a licensee with another person, the licensee shall submit all of the following, as applicable, to the department in a record:

(1) An application in a form and medium prescribed by the department.

(2) The plan of merger or consolidation in accordance with subdivision (e).

(3) In the case of a licensee, the information required by Section 3203 concerning the person that would be the surviving entity in the proposed merger or consolidation.

(b) If a proposed merger or consolidation would change the control of a licensee, the licensee shall comply with Section 3309 and this section.

(c) The department shall not approve the application for a merger or consolidation unless the commissioner finds all of the following:

(1) That the merger or consolidation will not result in a monopoly and will not be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or to attempt to monopolize digital financial business activity in this state.

(2) That the merger or consolidation will not have the effect in any section of this state of substantially lessening competition, tending to create a monopoly, or otherwise being in restraint of trade, or that the
 anticompetitive effect is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the merger in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served.

(3) That the financial condition of the surviving entity, including its capital and liquidity, will be satisfactorily based on the factors listed in subdivision (b) of Section 3207.

(4) That the executive officers of the surviving entity are of good character and sound financial standing and are competent to engage in digital financial business activity. 

(d) The department, in accordance with Section 3203, shall approve, conditionally approve, or deny an application for approval of a merger or consolidation of a licensee. The department, in a record,
 shall send notice of its decision to the licensee and the person that would be the surviving entity. If the department denies the application, the licensee shall abandon the merger or consolidation or cease digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents.

(e) The department may revoke or modify a determination under subdivision (c), after notice and opportunity to be heard, if, in its judgment, revocation or modification is consistent with this division.

(f) A plan of merger or consolidation of a licensee with another person shall do all of the following:

(1) Describe the effect of the proposed transaction on the licensee’s conduct of digital financial asset business activity with, or on
 behalf of, residents.

(2) Identify each person to be merged or consolidated and the person that would be the surviving entity.

(3) Describe the terms and conditions of the merger or consolidation and the mode of carrying it into effect.

(g) If a merger or consolidation of a licensee and another person requires approval of an agency of this state, and the action of the other agency conflicts with that of the department, the department shall confer with the other agency. If the proposed merger or consolidation cannot be completed because the conflict cannot be
 resolved, the licensee shall abandon the merger or consolidation or cease digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents.

(h) The department may condition approval of an application under subdivision (a). If the department does not receive notice from the parties that the parties accept the department’s condition not later than 31 days after the department sends notice in a record of the condition, the application is deemed denied. If the application is deemed denied, the licensee shall abandon the merger or consolidation or cease digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents.

(i) If a licensee acquires substantially all of the assets of a person, whether or not the person’s license was approved by the department,
 the transaction is subject to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Enforcement [3401. - 3415.]

3401.

For the purpose of this chapter, “enforcement measure” means an action that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Suspend or revoke a license under this division.

(b) Order a person to cease and desist from doing digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(c) Request the court to appoint a receiver for the assets of a person doing digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(d) Request the court to issue temporary,
 preliminary, or permanent injunctive relief against a person doing digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(e) Assess a penalty under Section 3407.

(f) Recover on the security under Section 3207 and initiate a plan to distribute the proceeds for the benefit of a resident injured by a violation of this division, or law of this state other than this division that applies to digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(g) Impose necessary or appropriate conditions on the conduct of digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(h) Seek restitution on behalf of a
 resident if the department shows economic injury due to a violation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3403.

(a) The department may take an enforcement measure against a licensee or person that is not a licensee but has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident in any of the following instances:

(1) The licensee or person materially violates this division, a rule adopted or order issued under this division, or a law of this state other than this division that applies to digital financial asset business activity of the violator with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(2) The licensee or person does not cooperate substantially with an
 examination or investigation by the department, fails to pay a fee, or fails to submit a report or documentation.

(3) The licensee or person, in the conduct of its digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident, has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in any of the following:

(A) An unsafe or unsound act or practice.

(B) An unfair or deceptive act or practice.

(C) Fraud or intentional misrepresentation.

(D) Misappropriation of legal tender, a digital financial asset, or other value held by a fiduciary.

(4) An agency of the United States or another state takes an action against the licensee or person, which would constitute an enforcement measure if the department had taken the action.

(5) The licensee or person is convicted of a crime related to its digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident or involving fraud or felonious activity that, as determined by the department, makes the licensee or person unsuitable to engage in digital financial asset business activity.

(6) Any of the following occurs:

(A) The licensee or person becomes insolvent.

(B) The licensee or person makes a general assignment for the benefit of its
 creditors.

(C) The licensee or person becomes the debtor, alleged debtor, respondent, or person in a similar capacity in a case or other proceeding under any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, readjustment, insolvency, receivership, dissolution, liquidation, or similar law, and does not obtain from the court, within a reasonable time, confirmation of a plan or dismissal of the case or proceeding.

(D) The licensee or person applies for, or permits the appointment of, a receiver, trustee, or other agent of a court for itself or for a substantial part of its assets.

(7) The licensee or person makes a material misrepresentation to the department.

(b) On application and for good cause, the department may do either of the following:

(1) Extend the due date for filing a document or report under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) Waive, to the extent warranted by circumstances, including a bona fide error notwithstanding reasonable procedures designed to prevent error, an enforcement measure issued for a violation described by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) if the department determines that the waiver will not adversely affect the likelihood of compliance with this division.

(c) In an enforcement action related to operating without a license under this division, it is a defense to the action that the person has in effect a customer identification
 program reasonably designed to identify whether a customer is a resident that failed to identify the particular customer as a resident.

(d) A proceeding under this division is subject to the Administrative Procedure Act, as described in Section 11370 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3405.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department may take an enforcement measure only after notice and opportunity for a hearing as appropriate in the circumstances.

(b) (1) (A) The department may take an enforcement measure, other than the imposition of a civil penalty under Section 3407, without notice if the circumstances require action before notice can be given.

(B) A person subject to an enforcement measure pursuant to this paragraph shall have the right to an expedited postaction hearing by the department unless the person has waived the hearing.

(2) (A) The department may take an enforcement measure, other than the imposition of a civil penalty under Section 3407, after notice and without a prior hearing if the circumstances require action before a hearing can be held.

(B) A person subject to an enforcement measure pursuant to this paragraph shall have the right to an expedited postaction hearing by the department unless the person has waived the hearing.

(3) The department may take an enforcement measure, other than the imposition of a civil penalty under Section 3407, after notice and without a hearing if the person conducting digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident does not timely request a
 hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3407.

(a) If a person other than a licensee has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident in violation of this division, the department may assess a civil penalty against the person in an amount not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each day the person is in violation of this division.

(b) If a licensee or covered person materially violates a provision of this division, the department may assess a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each day of violation or for each act or omission in violation.

(c) A civil penalty under this section continues to accrue until the date the violation ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3409.

(a) Revocation of a license under this division is effective against a licensee one day after the department sends notice in a record of the revocation to the licensee by a means reasonably selected for the notice to be received by the recipient in one day to the address provided for receiving communications from the department.

(b) Suspension of a license under this division or an order to cease and desist is effective against a licensee or other person one day after the department sends notice in a record of the suspension or order to the licensee or other person by a means reasonably selected for the notice to be received by the recipient in one day to the
 address provided for receiving communications from the department or, if no address is provided, to the recipient’s last known address. A suspension or order to cease and desist remains in effect until the earliest of the following:

(1) Entry of an order by the department under the Administrative Procedure Act, as described in Section 11370 of the Government Code.

(2) Entry of a court order setting aside or limiting the suspension or order to cease and desist.

(3) A date specified by the department.

(c) If, without reason to know of the department’s notice sent under this section, a licensee or other person does not comply in accordance with the notice until
 the notice is actually received at the address provided, the department may consider the delay in compliance in imposing a sanction for the failure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3411.

The department may enter into a consent order with a person regarding an enforcement measure. The order may provide that it does not constitute an admission of fact by a party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3413.

Whenever the commissioner deems it necessary for the general welfare of the public, the commissioner has continuous authority to exercise the powers set forth in this division whether or not an application for a license has been filed with the commissioner, any license has been issued, or if issued, has been surrendered, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3415.

(a) This chapter shall not be construed to provide a private right of action to a resident.

(b) The duties and obligations imposed by this chapter are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under any other law, and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under any other law. 

(c) This section does not preclude an action by a resident to enforce rights under Section 3503.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Disclosures and Protections [3501. - 3509.]

3501.

(a) When engaging in digital financial business activity with a resident, a covered person shall provide to a resident the disclosures required by subdivision (b) and any additional disclosure the department by rule determines reasonably necessary for the protection of residents. The department shall determine by rule the time and form required for disclosure. A disclosure required by this section shall be made separately from any other information provided by the covered person and in a clear and conspicuous manner in a record the resident may keep. A covered person may propose, for the department’s approval, alternate disclosures as more appropriate for its digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents.

(b) Before engaging in digital financial asset business activity with a resident, a covered person shall disclose, to the extent applicable to the digital financial asset business activity the covered person will undertake with the resident, all of the following:

(1) A schedule of fees and charges the covered person may assess, the manner by which fees and charges will be calculated if they are not set in advance and disclosed, and the timing of the fees and charges.

(2) Whether the product or service provided by the covered person is covered by either of the following:

(A) A form of insurance or other guarantee against loss by an agency of the United States as
 follows:

(i) Up to the full United States dollar equivalent of digital financial assets placed under the control of, or purchased from, the covered person as of the date of the placement or purchase, including the maximum amount provided by insurance under the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund, or otherwise available from the Securities Investor Protection Corporation.

(ii) If not provided at the full United States dollar equivalent of the digital financial asset placed under the control of or purchased from the covered person, the maximum amount of coverage for each resident expressed in the United States dollar equivalent of the digital financial asset.

(B) (i) Private insurance against theft or loss, including cybertheft or theft by other means.

(ii) Upon request of a resident with whom a covered person engages in digital financial asset business activity, a covered person shall disclose the terms of the insurance policy to the resident in a manner that allows the resident to understand the specific insured risks that may result in partial coverage of the resident’s assets.

(3) The irrevocability of a transfer or exchange and any exception to irrevocability.

(4) A description of all of the following:

(A) The covered person’s liability for an unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental transfer or exchange.

(B) The resident’s responsibility to provide notice to the covered person of an unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental transfer or exchange.

(C) The basis for any recovery by the resident from the covered person in case of an unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental transfer or exchange.

(D) General error resolution rights applicable to an unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental transfer or exchange.

(E) The method for the resident to update the resident’s contact information with the covered person.

(5) That the date or time when the transfer or exchange is made and the resident’s account is debited may
 differ from the date or time when the resident initiates the instruction to make the transfer or exchange.

(6) Whether the resident has a right to stop a preauthorized payment or revoke authorization for a transfer and the procedure to initiate a stop-payment order or revoke authorization for a subsequent transfer.

(7) The resident’s right to receive a receipt, trade ticket, or other evidence of the transfer or exchange.

(8) The resident’s right to at least 14 days’ prior notice of a change in the covered person’s fee schedule, other terms and conditions that have a material impact on digital financial asset business activity with the resident, or the policies applicable to the resident’s account. The 14-day notice
 requirement shall not apply to changes in terms and conditions or policies that are reasonably necessary to address a risk of loss to the resident or the covered person, to the extent that the change does not relate to the covered person’s fee schedule.

(9) That no digital financial asset is currently recognized as legal tender by California or the United States.

(10) (A) A list of instances in the past 12 months when the covered person’s service was unavailable to 10,000 or more customers seeking to engage in digital financial asset business activity due to a service outage on the part of the covered person and the causes of each identified service outage.

(B) As part of the disclosure required by
 this paragraph, the covered person may list any steps the covered person has taken to resolve underlying causes for those outages.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), at the conclusion of a digital financial asset transaction with, or on behalf of, a resident, a covered person shall provide the resident a confirmation in a record which contains all of the following:

(1) The name and contact information of the covered person, including the toll-free telephone number required under Section 3507.

(2) The type, value, date, precise time, and amount of the transaction.

(3) The fee charged for the transaction, including any charge for
 conversion of a digital financial asset to legal tender, bank credit, or other digital financial asset, as well as any indirect charges.

(d) If a covered person discloses that it will provide a daily confirmation in the initial disclosure under subdivision (c), the covered person may elect to provide a single, daily confirmation for all transactions with, or on behalf of, a resident on that day instead of a per transaction confirmation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 52, Sec. 7.   (SB 97)   Effective June 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

(a) (1) A covered person that has control of a digital financial asset for one or more persons shall at all times maintain in its control an amount of each type of digital financial asset sufficient to satisfy the aggregate entitlements of the persons to the type of digital financial asset.

(2) If a covered person violates this subdivision, the property interests of the persons in the digital financial asset are pro rata property interests in the type of digital financial asset to which the persons are entitled without regard to the time the persons became entitled to the digital financial asset or the covered person obtained control of the
 digital financial asset.

(b) A digital financial asset maintained for purposes of compliance with this section shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The digital financial asset shall be held for the persons entitled to the digital financial asset.

(2) The digital financial asset shall not be property of the covered person.

(3) The digital financial asset shall not be subject to the claims of creditors of the covered person.

(c) A covered person may comply with this section by including, and complying with, a provision in its contract with a resident that states all of the following:

(1) That a digital financial asset controlled by the covered person on behalf of the resident will be treated as a financial asset under Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) of the Commercial Code.

(2) That the covered person is a securities intermediary under Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) of the Commercial Code with respect to any digital financial assets under control of the covered person on behalf of the resident.

(3) That the resident’s account or wallet provided by or through the covered person is a securities account under Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) of the Commercial Code.

(d) Even if commingled with other assets of the
 covered person, digital financial assets maintained for purposes of compliance with this section are deemed to be held in trust for the benefit of the customers of the covered persons’ digital financial asset business activity, in the event of bankruptcy or receivership of the covered person, or in the event of an action by a creditor against the covered person who is not a beneficiary of this statutory trust. Digital financial assets maintained for purposes of compliance with this section or eligible securities impressed with a trust pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to attachment, levy of execution, or sequestration by order of any court, except for a beneficiary of this statutory trust.

(e) A covered person shall at all times own eligible securities, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 2082, having an aggregate
 market value computed in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the aggregate amount of all of its outstanding United States dollar-denominated liabilities owed to its customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3505.

(a) (1) Except as provided for under paragraph (2), a covered exchange, prior to listing or offering a digital financial asset that the covered exchange can exchange on behalf of a resident, shall certify on a form provided by the department that the covered exchange has done the following:

(A) Identified the likelihood that the digital financial asset would be deemed a security by federal or California regulators.

(B) Provided, in writing, full and fair disclosure of all material facts relating to conflicts of interest that are associated with the covered exchange and the digital financial asset.

(C) Conducted a comprehensive risk assessment designed to ensure consumers are adequately protected from cybersecurity risk, risk of malfeasance, including theft, risks related to code or protocol defects, or market-related risks, including price manipulation and fraud.

(D) Established policies and procedures to reevaluate the appropriateness of the continued listing or offering of the digital financial asset, including an evaluation of whether material changes have occurred.

(E) Established policies and procedures to cease listing or offering the digital financial asset, including notification to affected consumers and counterparties.

(2) Certification
 by a covered exchange shall not be required for any digital financial asset approved for listing on or before January 1, 2025, by the New York Department of Financial Services pursuant to Part 200 of Title 23 of the New York Code of Rules and Regulations.

(3) The department, after a finding that a covered exchange has listed or offered a digital financial asset without appropriate certification or after a finding that material misrepresentations were made in the certification process, shall require the covered exchange to cease offering or listing the digital financial asset and may assess the civil penalty of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per day the violation has occurred.

(b) (1) A covered exchange shall make every effort to execute a resident’s
 request to exchange a digital financial asset that the covered exchange receives fully and promptly.

(2) (A) A covered exchange shall use reasonable diligence to ensure that the outcome to the resident is as favorable as possible under prevailing market conditions. Compliance with this paragraph shall be determined by factors, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The character of the market for the digital financial asset, including price and volatility.

(ii) The size and type of transaction.

(iii) The number of markets checked.

(iv) Accessibility of appropriate
 pricing.

(B) At least once every six months, a covered exchange shall review aggregated trading records of residents against benchmarks to determine execution quality, shall investigate the causes of any variance, and shall promptly take action to remedy issues identified in that review.

(3) (A) In a transaction for or with a resident, the covered exchange shall not interject a third party between the covered exchange and the best market for the digital financial asset in a manner inconsistent with this subdivision.

(B) This paragraph
 does not apply to a transaction in which a resident receives stablecoin in exchange for legal tender or bank or credit union credit. For purposes of this subparagraph, “stablecoin” has the same meaning as “payment stablecoin,” as defined in Section 5901 of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(4) If a covered exchange cannot execute directly with a market and employs other means in order to ensure an execution advantageous to the resident, the burden of showing the acceptable circumstances for doing so is on the covered exchange.

(5) A covered exchange shall provide and make available to a resident an up-to-date description of the order execution practices of the covered exchange, which shall include a description of how the covered exchange receives and achieves the order preferences of
 a resident.

(6) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize the department to impose, by rule, specific trade routing rules.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Conflict of interest” means an interest that might incline a covered exchange or a natural person who is an associated person of a covered exchange to make a recommendation that is not disinterested.

(2) “Covered exchange” means a covered person that exchanges or holds itself out as being able to exchange a digital financial asset for a resident.

(d) Failure of a particular policy or procedure adopted under this section to
 meet its goals in a particular instance is not a ground for liability of the licensee if the policy or procedure was created, implemented, and monitored properly. Repeated failures of a policy or procedure are evidence that the policy or procedure was not created or implemented properly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 52, Sec. 8.   (SB 97)   Effective June 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3507.

A covered person shall prominently display on its internet website a toll-free telephone number through which a resident can contact the licensee for customer service issues and receive live customer assistance. The telephone line shall be operative 10 hours per day, Monday through Friday, excluding federal holidays.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3509.

The requirements imposed on a covered person or a covered exchange under this chapter shall be operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 945, Sec. 3.   (AB 1934)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Policies and Procedures [3701. - 3702.]

3701.

(a) An applicant, before submitting an application, shall create and, during licensure, maintain in a record policies and procedures for all of the following:

(1) An information security program and an operational security program.

(2) A business continuity program.

(3) A disaster recovery program.

(4) An antifraud program.

(5) A program to prevent money laundering.

(6) A
 program to prevent funding of terrorist activity.

(7) (A) A program designed to ensure compliance with this division and other laws of this state or federal laws applicable to the digital financial asset business activity contemplated by the licensee with, or on behalf of, residents and to assist the licensee in achieving the purposes of other state laws and federal laws if violation of those laws has a remedy under this division.

(B) The program described by this paragraph shall specify detailed policies and procedures that the licensee undertakes to minimize the probability that the licensee facilitates the exchange of unregistered securities.

(b) A policy required by subdivision (a) shall be in a record and designed
 to be adequate for a licensee’s contemplated digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents, considering the circumstances of all participants and the safe operation of the activity. Any policy and implementing procedure shall be compatible with other policies and the procedures implementing them and not conflict with policies or procedures applicable to the licensee under other state law. A policy and implementing procedure may be one in existence in the licensee’s digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents.

(c) A licensee’s policy for detecting fraud shall include all of the following:

(1) Identification and assessment of the material risks of its digital financial asset business activity related to fraud, which shall
 include any form of market manipulation and insider trading by the licensee, its employees, or its customers.

(2) Protection against any material risk related to fraud identified by the department or the licensee.

(3) Periodic evaluation and revision of the antifraud procedure.

(d) A licensee’s policy for preventing money laundering and financing of terrorist activity shall include all of the following:

(1) Identification and assessment of the material risks of its digital financial asset business activity related to money laundering and financing of terrorist activity.

(2) Procedures, in
 accordance with federal law or guidance published by federal agencies responsible for enforcing federal law, pertaining to money laundering and financing of terrorist activity.

(3) Filing reports under the Bank Secrecy Act (31 U.S.C. Sec. 5311 et seq.) or Chapter X of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations and other federal or state law pertaining to the prevention or detection of money laundering or financing of terrorist activity.

(e) A licensee’s information security and operational security policy shall include reasonable and appropriate administrative, physical, and technical safeguards to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of any nonpublic personal information or digital financial asset it receives, maintains, or transmits.

(f) A licensee shall file with the department a copy of a report it makes to a federal authority.

(g) A licensee’s protection policy under subdivision (e) for residents shall include all of the following:

(1) Any action or system of records required to comply with this division and other state law applicable to the licensee with respect to digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(2) A procedure for resolving disputes between the licensee and a resident.

(3) A procedure for a resident to report an unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental digital financial asset
 business activity transaction.

(4) A procedure for a resident to file a complaint with the licensee and for the resolution of the complaint in a fair and timely manner with notice to the resident as soon as reasonably practical of the resolution and the reasons for the resolution.

(h) After the policies and procedures required under this section are created by the licensee, the licensee shall engage a responsible individual with adequate authority and experience to monitor each policy and procedure, publicize it as appropriate, recommend changes as desirable, and enforce it.

(i) A licensee may request advice from the department as to compliance with this section and, with the department’s approval, outsource
 functions, other than compliance, required under this section, and may request a determination from the department that a policy or procedure is not subject to the disclosure requirement described in subdivision (k) due to potential security risks.

(j) Failure of a particular policy or procedure adopted under this section to meet its goals in a particular instance is not a ground for liability of the licensee if the policy or procedure was created, implemented, and monitored properly. Repeated failures of a policy or procedure are evidence that the policy or procedure was not created or implemented properly.

(k) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), policies and procedures adopted under this section shall be disclosed separately from other disclosures made